California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142153.

The authority may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142154.

The authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States, with any public agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, the Council of Fresno County Governments, or any county, city, or district, or with any person upon any terms and conditions that the authority finds in its best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142155.

(a) Contracts for the purchase of services, supplies, equipment, and materials in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in an emergency declared by the authority or by an executive committee to which the authority has delegated responsibility to make that declaration.

(b) If, after rejecting bids received under subdivision (a), the authority determines and declares that, in its opinion, the services, supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price on the open market, the authority may proceed to purchase these services, supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions regarding contracts, bids, or advertisements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Transportation Coordination [142200. - 142201.]

142200.

The authority shall consult with, and coordinate its actions to secure funding for the completion and improvement of the priority regional transportation improvements with the cities in the county, the board of supervisors, the Council of Fresno County Governments, and the Department of Transportation for the purpose of integrating its planned improvements with the other transportation improvement plans and operations of other transportation agencies impacting the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142201.

The authority shall prepare and adopt an annual report each year on progress made to achieve the objective of improving transportation conditions related to priority regional transportation improvements and other local transportation needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Transactions and Use Taxes [142250. - 142277.]

142250.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance, applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the county may be imposed by the authority in accordance with Section 142262 of this code and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve the imposition of the tax at an election which shall be called for that purpose by resolution of the
 board of supervisors.

(b) The election shall be held in the November 2002 or a subsequent general election.

(c) The tax ordinance shall become operative as set forth in Section 142253.The tax ordinance shall specify the period, not to exceed 30 years, during which the tax is to be imposed. The tax may be terminated earlier if the conditions of Sections 142255, 142256, 142257, and 142260 have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142251.

The authority, in the retail transactions and use tax ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, shall provide the tax rate or rates or the maximum tax rate or rates, shall specify the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, and may set a term, not to exceed 30 years, during which the tax may be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142252.

(a) The county shall conduct an election called by the board of supervisors to implement this chapter pursuant to Section 142250, and the authority shall reimburse the county for the county’s costs in conducting the election.

(b) The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142253.

Any retail transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142254.

The revenues from the retail transactions and use taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter may be allocated by the authority for the administration of this division and for transportation improvement purposes, including administration of this division, legal actions related thereto, planning, environmental reviews, design, construction, and repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142255.

A county transportation expenditure plan shall be prepared by the transportation planning agency for the expenditure of the revenues expected to be derived from the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter, together with other federal, state, and local funds expected to be available for transportation improvements, for the period during which the tax is to be imposed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142256.

(a) A county transportation expenditure plan shall not be adopted by the authority until it has received the approval of the board of supervisors and of the city councils representing both a majority of the cities in the county and a majority of the population residing in the incorporated areas of the county.

(b) The plan shall be adopted prior to the call of the election provided for in Section
 142250.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142257.

(a) The expenditure plan shall specify the amount and the formula by which the retail transactions and use tax shall be allocated to each city and the county for local transportation purposes determined to be priority projects by local governments to which funds are allocated.

For purposes of this subdivision, the population of the county is the population of the unincorporated area of the county.

(b) Prior to the authority allocating funds, each local government shall certify to the authority that the funds will not be substituted for property tax funds which are currently utilized to fund existing local transportation programs. If the local government is unable to segregate property tax revenues from other general fund revenues which cannot be so distinguished, substitution of funds from the authority for general funds is also prohibited.

(c) The authority shall require that local governments to which funds are allocated to separately account for those funds and maintain records of expenditures in accordance with administrative code requirements adopted by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142258.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by Section 142260, the transportation planning agency may amend the expenditure plan. The transportation planning agency, at a minimum, shall review biennially and assess the needs for transportation improvements contained in the expenditure plan as specified in Section 142255. As part of this review and assessment, the transportation planning agency may solicit proposals for transportation improvements from the Department of
 Transportation and the cities and the county. The transportation planning agency shall adopt a procedure for evaluating these proposals in consultation with the Department of Transportation and the cities and the county.

(b) Based on the evaluation, the transportation planning agency shall prepare an updated plan for the expenditure of the revenues expected to be derived from the retail transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this chapter, together with other federal, state, and local improvements, for the period during which the tax is imposed. The first five years of the plan shall be incorporated into the transportation planning agency’s annual submission to the California Transportation Commission for the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(c) The expenditure
 plan shall also include projections of revenues likely to be available from other federal, state, and local funds expected to be available for expenditure plan transportation improvements for the period during which the tax is imposed.

(d) Before adoption of an expenditure plan, the transportation planning agency shall conduct public hearings on the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142259.

Amendments to the expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 142255 are to provide for the use of additional federal, state, and local funds, to account for unexpected revenues, or to take into consideration unforeseen circumstances. The transportation planning agency shall take all appropriate actions to give highest priority to the projects in the initial expenditure plan, and any amendments shall not delay or delete any project in the initial plan without the transportation
 planning agency holding a public hearing and documenting within the plan the reason why the amendments are being recommended to the authority and are necessary relative to conditions beyond control of the authority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142260.

(a) The authority may, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members, approve the updated expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 142258.

(b) The authority may amend the expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 142258, if required, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The authority shall take all
 appropriate actions to give highest priority to the projects in the initial expenditure plan, and if any amendments delay or delete any project in the initial plan, the authority shall hold a public hearing and adopt a resolution initiating the amendments that specifically detail the reason why the amendments are necessary relative to conditions beyond the control of the authority.

(2) The authority shall notify the transportation planning agency, the board of supervisors, and the city council of each city in the county and provide them with a copy of the proposed amendments.

(3) The amendment is approved by the board of supervisors.

(4) The amendment is approved by a majority of the cities constituting a majority of the population residing in the incorporated areas of the county.

(c) The proposed amendments shall become effective immediately upon completion of the approval process in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 248, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142261.

If a retail transactions and use tax is adopted pursuant to this chapter, the authority shall prepare and submit a report to the Department of Transportation, to the board of supervisors, to the city council of each city in the county, and to the transportation planning agency, on or before each January 1 after taxes are imposed pursuant to this chapter. The report shall evaluate and report the progress made in implementing the expenditure plan during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142262.

The authority, subject to the approval of the voters, may impose the retail transactions and use tax at a maximum rate of one-half of 1 percent under this chapter and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and may state the maximum tax rate in terms of not to exceed one-half of 1 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142263.

(a) The board of supervisors, or its designee, as part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, shall seek authorization from the electors to issue bonds payable solely from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be authorized shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal and interest on the bonds, not to
 exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax, for a period of not more than 30 years. The actual wording of the proposition on any short form of ballot card, label, or other device, regardless of the system of voting used, shall include all of the following:

(1) The nature of the tax to be imposed.

(2) The tax rate or the maximum tax rate.

(3) The period during which the tax will be imposed.

(4) The purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used.

(c) The sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, pursuant to Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall include the full proposition, and the voter information handbook shall include the entire expenditure plan adopted by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 248, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142264.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued by the authority at any time, and from time to time, payable solely from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.”

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter has priority over the use of any of the tax for pay-as-you-go financing, except to the extent that that
 priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142265.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the authority. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of the bonds authorized have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142266.

(a) A resolution authorizing the issuance of limited tax bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to
 accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term that the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not be beyond the date of termination of the imposition of the retail transactions and use tax.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when all of, or any part of, the principal becomes due and payable.

(b) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this chapter or any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142267.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds, or any series thereof, may be for any period not exceeding one year, as determined by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142268.

In the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the authority may also provide for call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon other terms as specified. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142269.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the auditor-controller-treasurer of the county and other places as may be designated by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142270.

(a) The bonds, or each series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the authority and the auditor-controller-treasurer of the county, and the official seal of the authority shall be attached.

(b) The interest coupons of the bonds, if any, shall be signed by the auditor-controller-treasurer of the county.

(c) All signatures and
 the seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures on the bonds shall be manually affixed.

(d) If any officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142271.

The bonds may be sold as the authority determines by resolution. The authority may sell the bonds at a price below par, whether by negotiated or public sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142272.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142273.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the authority and applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a
 fund to be used for the purchase of outstanding bonds of the authority from time to time in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the authority. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142274.

(a) The authority may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange or refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the authority upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of
 the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142275.

(a) The authority may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the authority available therefor, including the revenues from the retail transactions and use taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the authority has been authorized to issue less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The
 bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142276.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investments for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter; and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school district, or other districts within the state may, by any law now
 or thereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued under this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142277.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter, or the issuance of any bonds thereunder, or any of the proceedings in relation thereto, is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and
 incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15.5. TUOLUMNE COUNTY TRAFFIC AUTHORITY [150000. - 150214.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions, Findings, and Definitions [150000. - 150010.]

150000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Tuolumne County Road Facilities Improvement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Recognizing the scarcity of resources available for all transportation development, the alternative methods of financing provided in this division are needed to finance the cost of maintaining, acquiring, constructing, and developing facilities for transportation systems in the County of Tuolumne and these methods will increase economic opportunities, contribute to economic development, be in the public interest and serve a public purpose, and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens within the County of Tuolumne.

(b) It is in the public interest to allow the voters of Tuolumne County to create the Tuolumne County Traffic Authority so that local decisions can be implemented in a timely manner to provide improvements to the transportation system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150002.

“Bonds” means indebtedness and securities of any kind or class, including bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, and commercial paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150003.

“Authority” means the Tuolumne County Traffic Authority created pursuant to this division in the County of Tuolumne.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150004.

“City” means the City of Sonora in the County of Tuolumne.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150005.

“County” means the unincorporated area of the County of Tuolumne.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150006.

“County of Tuolumne” and “Tuolumne County” mean the entire territory of the County of Tuolumne, including the territory of incorporated cities within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150007.

“Electors” means the electors of the city with respect to a city ordinance, or the electors of the county with respect to a county ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150008.

“Ordinance” means either a city ordinance or a county ordinance, adopted pursuant to Section 150201, which imposes a retail transactions and use tax within the city or the county, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150009.

“Tuolumne County LTC” means the Tuolumne County and Cities Area Planning Council, the transportation planning agency for the county established pursuant to Section 29535 of the Government Code. Any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions of the LTC is granted the powers and duties of the LTC under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150010.

“Voters” means the voters of the city with respect to a city ordinance, or the voters of the county with respect to a county ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of the Authority [150050. - 150052.]

150050.

There is hereby created the Tuolumne County Traffic Authority in the County of Tuolumne.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150051.

The appointed Commissioners of the Tuolumne County LTC shall serve as the Tuolumne County Traffic Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150052.

The authority shall hire only that staff as may be necessary to meet its responsibilities, but shall strive to use the existing Tuolumne County LTC staff and committees to the greatest extent possible. The Tuolumne County LTC shall be reimbursed by the authority for any staff services it provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [150100. - 150105.]

150100.

The organization and procedures manual of the Tuolumne County LTC shall be the established rules for the proceedings and administration of the authority except as provided otherwise in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150101.

Meetings of the authority shall be held at least annually and as often as determined necessary by the authority.

All meetings of the authority shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150102.

The acts of the authority shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150103.

The authority shall expend only that amount of the funds generated pursuant to this division for staff support, audit, administrative expenses, and contract services that are necessary and reasonable to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this division.

The authority shall not expend more than 5 percent of the funds generated pursuant to this division in any year for salaries and benefits of its staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150104.

The authority shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the authority and of all revenues expended pursuant to this division to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(c) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150105.

(a) The authority shall publish, pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, notice of the time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget not later than 15 days prior to the hearing.

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions [150150. - 150155.]

150150.

The authority may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150151.

The authority may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all court tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150152.

All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150153.

The authority may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150154.

The authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, the Tuolumne County LTC, or with any person upon any terms and conditions that the authority finds is in its best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150155.

The authority may provide and maintain, by contract with a public agency or by other means, a security force to enforce its regulations, preserve and protect any project financed pursuant to this division, and preserve and protect the public peace, health, and safety with respect to its projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Transactions and Use Tax [150200. - 150214.]

150200.

The Legislature, by the enactment of this chapter, intends the additional funds provided government agencies by this chapter to supplement existing local revenues being used for public transportation purposes. The government agencies are further encouraged to maintain their existing commitment of local funds for public transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150201.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance shall be imposed by the authority in accordance with Section 150206 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if a majority of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve its imposition at special elections called for that purpose by the county and city, respectively. Those elections shall be consolidated. The ordinances shall take effect at the close of the polls on the day of election at which the measures are adopted, to impose the tax at the same rate.

The initial collection of the retail transactions and use tax shall take place in accordance with Section 150204.

If, at any time, the voters do not approve an ordinance imposing the retail transactions and use tax, the same or a different measure imposing that tax may, at any time thereafter, be submitted to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150202.

The retail transactions and use tax ordinance shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, the tax rate or the maximum tax rate, the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, and may set a term, not to exceed 15 years, during which the tax will be imposed. The purposes for which the tax revenues will be used may include, but are not limited to, the administration of this division, including legal actions related thereto, the construction, capital acquisition, maintenance, and operation of streets, roads, and highways, including state highways. These purposes include expenditures for the planning, environmental reviews, engineering and design costs, and related right-of-way acquisition. The ordinance shall reference an expenditure plan which shall include the allocation of revenues for the purposes authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150203.

(a) The county shall conduct the elections called pursuant to Section 150201.

(b) The elections shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150204.

(a) Any retail transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after adoption of the ordinance.
